Utah statutes.
67-5b-101.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Abused child" means a child 17 years of age or younger who is a victim of:

(a)  sexual abuse or physical abuse; or

(b)  other crimes involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as in drug-related child endangerment cases.

(2)  "Center" means a Children's Justice Center established in accordance with Section 67-5b-102.

(3)  "Officers and employees" means any person performing services for two or more public agencies as agreed in memoranda of understanding in accordance with Section 67-5b-104.

(4)  "Public agency" means a municipality, a county, the attorney general, the Division of Child and Family Services, the Division of Juvenile Justice Services, the Department of Corrections, the juvenile court, and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

(5)  "Volunteer" means any person who donates service without pay or other compensation except expenses actually and reasonably incurred as approved by the supervising agency.  Volunteer does not include any person participating in human subjects research and court-ordered compensatory service workers as defined in Section 67-20-2.



Amended by Chapter 129, 2011 General Session

